Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.068, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (a) "Qualified research expenses" means (i) qualified research expenses and basic research payments as defined in section 41(b) and (e) of the Internal Revenue Code, except it does not include expenses incurred for qualified research or basic research conducted outside the state of Minnesota pursuant to section 41(d) and (e) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) contributions to a nonprofit corporation established and operated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 317A for the purpose of promoting the establishment and expansion of business in this state, provided the contributions are invested by the nonprofit corporation for the purpose of providing funds for small, technologically innovative enterprises in Minnesota during the early stages of their development. (b) "Qualified research" means qualified research as defined in section 41(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that the term does not include qualified research conducted outside the state of Minnesota. (c) "Base amount" meansnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1) for taxpayers not subject to clause (2), thenew text end base amount as defined in section 41(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that the average annual gross receipts and aggregate gross receipts must be calculated using Minnesota sales or receipts under section 290.191 and the definitions deleted text begin containeddeleted text end in paragraphs (a) and (b) deleted text begin shalldeleted text end applydeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) for a taxpayer with an alternative simplified credit election in place under subdivision 2a for the taxable year, 50 percent of the average qualified Minnesota research expenses for the three taxable years preceding the taxable year for which the credit is being determined. new text end (d) "Liability for tax" means the sum of the tax imposed under section 290.06, subdivisions 1 and 2c, for the taxable year reduced by the sum of the nonrefundable credits allowed under this chapter, on all of the entities required to be included on the combined report of the unitary business. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.068, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Alternative simplified credit election. new text end new text begin (a) A corporation, partnership, or other taxpayer qualifying for a credit under this section may elect, not later than the time of filing the return for the taxable year, including all extensions, to calculate its base amount under subdivision 2, paragraph (c), clause (2), for the taxable year. An election made under this subdivision for a taxable year is irrevocable for that taxable year. new text end new text begin (b) For a partnership, the election must be made by the partnership on the partnership return or other form, as required by the commissioner, and applies to all of its partners. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end